Washington statutes.
RCW 43.92.025

Seismic, landslide, and tsunami hazards—Assessment—Technical assistance.

(1) In addition to the objectives stated in RCW 43.92.020, the geological survey must conduct and maintain an assessment of seismic, landslide, and tsunami hazards in Washington. This assessment must apply the best practicable technology, including light detection and ranging (lidar) mapping, to identify and map volcanic, seismic, landslide, and tsunami hazards, and estimate potential hazard consequences and the likelihood of a hazard occurring.

(2) The geological survey must:

(a) Coordinate with state and local government agencies to compile existing data, including geological hazard maps and geotechnical reports, tending to inform geological hazard planning decisions;

(b) Acquire and process new data or update deficient data using the best practicable technology, including lidar;

(c) Create and maintain an efficient, publicly available database of lidar and geological hazard maps and geotechnical reports collected under (a) and (b) of this subsection; and

(d) Provide technical assistance to state and local government agencies on the proper interpretation and application of the results of the geological hazards assessment.

[ 2015 c 12 s 1; 2006 c 340 s 4.]